Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-911
Director; information for Legislature.

The Director of Correctional Services shall be prepared to give any information desired by the Legislature concerning the institutions under his control, and his administration shall be subject to examination under oath by a legislative committee touching any matter in regard to which the Legislature may desire information concerning the condition of the institutions, their inmates, and the performance of their duties by the director or his employees. The committee may call and examine under oath any other persons as witnesses in such investigation. Such examinations shall be conducted in the manner and subject to the provisions of section 83-114.

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 63.